Utah statutes.
11-25-9.   Bonds payable solely from revenues -- Cities, towns and counties
not obligated.
Revenues shall be the sole source of funds pledged by the agency for repayment
of its bonds. Bonds issued under the provisions of this part shall not be
deemed to constitute a debt or liability of the agency or a pledge of the
faith and credit of the agency but shall be payable solely from revenues. The
issuance of bonds shall not directly, indirectly, or contingently obligate a
city, town or county, or a city or town and county which has designated its
governing body as an agency to levy or pledge any form of taxation or to make
any appropriation for payment of bonds issued by an agency.
